lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Jojimo sportas > Žirgų priežiūra > Žirgų priežiūra: Arklių kirpimo mašinėlių peiliukų galąstuvai; Arklių kirpimo mašinėlių peiliukai; Arklių kirpimo mašinėlių dalys ir priedai; Kirpimo mašinėlės ir kirptukai žirgams; Arklio kailio purškalai ir blizgikliai; Šukos, šepečiai ir pirštinės žirgams; Žirgų priežiūros rinkiniai; Žirgų šampūnai ir kondicionieriai
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Binicilik > At Bakım Ürünleri > At Tımarlama: At kırkma makinesi bıçak bileyicileri; At kırkma makinesi bıçakları; At kırkma makinesi parçaları ve aksesuarları; Toynak Makasları ve Kırpma Makineleri; At tüy spreyleri ve parlatıcıları; At Tımar Tarakları, Fırçaları ve Eldivenleri; At tımar kitleri; At şampuanları ve bakım kremleri
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Equestrian > Horse Care > Horse Grooming: Horse Clipper Blade Sharpeners; Horse Clipper Blades; Horse Clipper Parts & Accessories; Horse Clippers & Trimmers; Horse Coat Sprays & Glosses; Horse Grooming Combs, Brushes & Mitts; Horse Grooming Kits; Horse Shampoos & Conditioners
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Equestre > Cuidados com cavalos > Escovagem de cavalos: Afiadores de lâminas para máquinas de tosquiar cavalos; Lâminas para máquinas de tosquiar cavalos; Peças e acessórios para máquinas de tosquiar cavalos; Aparadores para cavalos; Sprays e brilhos para a pelagem do cavalo; Luvas, escovas e pentes para escovagem de cavalos; Kits de limpeza de cavalo; Champôs e amaciadores para cavalo
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Esportes equestres > Suprimentos para cavalos > Grooming de cavalos: Afiadores de lâminas para tosquiadeiras de cavalos; Lâminas para tosquiadeiras de cavalos; Peças e acessórios para tosquiadeiras de cavalos; Tosadores e aparadores para cavalos; Sprays e abrilhantadores de pelagem para cavalo; Pentes, escovas e luvas para cuidados com cavalos; Kits de limpeza para cavalo; Shampoos e condicionadores para cavalo
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Jezdectví > Potřeby pro koně > Péče o koně: Brousky na čepele strojků pro koně; Čepele strojků pro koně; Díly a příslušenství ke strojkům pro koně; Zastřihovače a trimovače pro koně; Spreje a lesky na srst koní; Hříbla, kartáče a rukavice pro péči o koně; Sady na čištění koní; Šampony a kondicionéry pro koně
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Hestesport > Hestepleie > Hesterøkting: Slipere for hesteklippere; Klippeskjær til hesteklippere; Deler og tilbehør til hesteklippere; Hesteklippere og -trimmere; Pelsglans for hest; Kammer, børster og vanter for hestepleie; Pussesett for hest; Hestesjampo og balsam
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Jahanje > Njega konja > Timarenje konja: Oštrila za škare za šišanje konja; Oštrice za šišanje konja; Dijelovi i pribor za šišanje konja; Škare i trimeri za šišanje konja; Sprejevi i sjajila za konjsku dlaku; Češljevi, četke i rukavice za timarenje konja; Kompleti za timarenje konja; Šamponi i regeneratori za konja
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Jazdectvo > Starostlivosť o kone > Starostlivosť o kone: Brúsky na čepele strojčekov na strihanie koní; Nože do strojčeka na strihanie koní; Súčiastky a príslušenstvo pre strojčeky na strihanie koní; Strihacie strojčeky a zastrihávače pre kone; Spreje a lesky na konskú srsť; Hrebene, kefy a rukavice pre kone; Súpravy hrebeňov pre kone; Šampóny a kondicionéry pre kone
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Hästsport > Hästutrustning > Hästryktning: Slipmaskiner för klippskär till häst; Klippmaskinsskär för häst; Delar och tillbehör för hästklippmaskiner; Hästklippning och trimning; Pälsspray och pälsglans för hästar; Ryktborstar och mankammar för hästar; Ryktkit för hästar; Hästschampon och hästbalsam
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ιππασία > Φροντίδα αλόγων > Καλλωπισμός αλόγων: Ακονιστήρια λεπίδων για κουρευτικές μηχανές αλόγων; Λεπίδες για κουρευτικές μηχανές αλόγων; Εξαρτήματα & αξεσουάρ για κουρευτικές μηχανές αλόγων; Κουρευτικές μηχανές για άλογα; Σπρέι & γυαλιστικά τριχώματος αλόγου; Χτένες, βούρτσες & γάντια καλλωπισμού για άλογα; Κιτ περιποίησης αλόγου; Σαμπουάν & μαλακτικά αλόγων
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Echitație > Îngrijirea cailor > Întreținerea cailor: Dispozitive de ascuțit lame pentru mașini de tuns cai; Lame pentru mașini de tuns cai; Piese și accesorii pentru mașini de tuns cai; Mașini de tuns și scurtat pentru cai; Sprayuri și produse de luciu pentru blana calului; Piepteni, perii și mănuși pentru întreținerea cailor; Kituri de îngrijire pentru cai; Șampoane și balsamuri pentru cai
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 乗馬 > 馬用品 > 馬用グルーミング用品: 馬用バリカン替刃研磨機; 馬用バリカン替刃; 馬用バリカンパーツ＆アクセサリー; 馬用バリカン; 馬用コートスプレー・グロス; 馬用グルーミングコーム・ブラシ; 馬用お手入れキット; 馬用シャンプー・コンディショナー
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Jeździectwo > Produkty do pielęgnacji koni > Artykuły do pielęgnacji koni: Ostrzałki do ostrzy maszynek do strzyżenia koni; Ostrza do maszynek do strzyżenia koni; Części i akcesoria do maszynek do strzyżenia koni; Nożyce i trymery dla koni; Spraye nabłyszczające do sierści koni; Rękawice, szczotki i grzebienie do czyszczenia koni; Zestawy do pielęgnacji koni; Szampony i odżywki dla koni
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Equitación > Cuidado de caballos > Acicalamiento de caballos: Afiladores de cuchillas de esquiladoras para caballos; Cuchillas de esquiladoras para caballos; Piezas y accesorios de esquiladoras para caballos; Cortapelos para caballos; Aerosoles y abrillantadores de pelaje para caballos; Peines, cepillos y guantes para acicalar caballos; Kits de aseo para caballos; Champús y acondicionadores para caballos
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 승마 > 말 관리 > 말털 손질용품: 말 클리퍼 날 연마기; 말 클리퍼 날; 말 클리퍼 부품 및 액세서리; 말 이발기; 말 코트 스프레이 및 광택제; 말 그루밍 빗/브러시/미트; 말 그루밍 키트; 말 샴푸 및 컨디셔너
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Cưỡi ngựa > Chăm sóc ngựa > Chải lông ngựa: Dụng cụ mài lưỡi tông đơ cắt lông ngựa; Lưỡi tông đơ cắt lông ngựa; Phụ kiện và bộ phận tông đơ cắt lông ngựa; Dụng cụ cắt và tỉa lông cho ngựa; Xịt dưỡng bóng lông ngựa; Lược, bàn chải cho ngựa và găng tay hở ngón; Bộ dụng cụ chải lông ngựa; Dầu gội & xả cho ngựa
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 馬術運動 > 馬匹照護用品 > 馬梳: 馬匹剃毛刀片磨刀器; 馬匹剃毛刀片; 馬匹剃毛剪零件與配件; 馬毛剪; 馬匹毛髮噴霧與亮光劑; 馬匹清潔梳子/毛刷/手套; 馬匹美容工具包; 馬匹洗髮精與潤髮乳
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Конен спорт > Грижа за коне > Подстригване на коне: Острилки за ножове за машинки за подстригване на коне; Ножове за машинки за подстригване на коне; Части и аксесоари за машинки за подстригване на коне; Машинки за подстригван и тримери за коне; Спрейове и гланцове за конска козина; Гребени, четки и ръкавици за коне; Комплекти за грижа за коне; Шампоани и балсами за коне
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การขี่ม้า > การดูแลม้า > อุปกรณ์เสริมสวยสำหรับม้า: เครื่องลับใบมีดปัตตาเลี่ยนตัดขนม้า; ใบมีดปัตตาเลี่ยนตัดขนม้า; ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับปัตตาเลี่ยนตัดขนม้า; ที่ตัดแต่งขนม้า; สเปรย์บำรุงและเพิ่มความเงางามขนม้า; หวี แปรง และถุงมือดูแลม้า; ชุดเครื่องมือแปรงขนม้า; แชมพูและครีมนวดสำหรับม้า
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Конный спорт > Товары для ухода за лошадьми > Уход за лошадьми: Точилки для ножей машинок для стрижки лошадей; Ножи для машинок для стрижки лошадей; Детали и аксессуары для машинок для стрижки лошадей; Триммеры и машинки для стрижки лошадей; Спреи и блески для шерсти лошади; Расчески, щетки и перчатки для вычесывания лошадей; Наборы для чистки лошадей; Шампуни и кондиционеры для лошадей
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Jahanje > Nega konj > Urejanje konj: Brusilniki rezil za strižnike za konje; Rezila za strižnike za konje; Deli in dodatki za strižnike za konje; Strižniki in prirezovalniki za konje; Razpršila za lesk konjske dlake; Glavniki, krtače in rokavice za nego konj; Kompleti za nego konjev; Šamponi in balzami za konje
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Dressur > Produkter til hestepleje > Hestepleje: Slibere til skær til hesteklippere; Skær til hesteklippere; Dele og tilbehør til hesteklippere; Hesteklippere og -trimmere; Pelsspray og glans til heste; Kamme, børster og handsker til strigling; Striglesæt til heste; Shampoo og balsam til heste
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Reitsportzubehör > Pferdebedarf > Pferdehaarpflege: Schleifgeräte für Pferdeschermesser; Schermesser für Pferde; Ersatzteile & Zubehör für Pferdeschermaschinen; Pferdeschermaschinen; Fellglanzsprays für Pferde; Kämme, Bürsten & Striegel; Pferde-Putzzeug-Sets; Pferdeshampoos & Conditioner
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 马术用品 > 马匹护理用品 > 马毛梳洗: 马匹推剪刀片磨刀器; 马匹推剪刀片; 马匹推剪零件和配件; 马匹理毛器/剪毛器; 马毛喷雾和亮毛剂; 马毛梳洗梳子、刷子与手套; 马匹美容套件; 马用洗发水和护发素
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Équitation > Articles pour chevaux > Articles de toilettage pour chevaux: Affûteurs de lames de tondeuses pour chevaux; Lames de tondeuses pour chevaux; Pièces et accessoires de tondeuses pour chevaux; Tondeuses pour chevaux; Lustrants et soins pour robe de cheval; Peignes, brosses et gants de toilettage; Kits de pansage pour cheval; Shampoings et démêlants pour cheval
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Ratsastus > Hevostenhoito > Hevosen hoitaminen: Hevosten trimmauskoneiden terien teroittimet; Hevosten trimmauskoneiden terät; Hevosten trimmauskoneiden osat ja lisävarusteet; Hevosen leikkurit ja trimmauskoneet; Hevosen kiiltosuihkeet; Hevosen kammat, harjat ja suat; Hevosenhoitosarjat; Hevosen shampoot ja hoitoaineet
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Paardensport > Verzorging van paarden > Paardenverzorging: Slijpers voor paardenscheermessen; Paardenscheermessen; Onderdelen en accessoires voor paardenscheermachines; Paardentondeuses; Vachtsprays en -glansmiddelen voor paarden; Kammen, borstels en handschoenen voor paardenverzorging; Poetskits voor paarden; Shampoo en conditioner voor paarden
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Equitazione > Cura dei cavalli > Strigliatura cavalli: Affilatori per lame per tosatrici per cavalli; Lame per tosatrici per cavalli; Componenti e accessori per tosatrici per cavalli; Forbici e taglia peli per cavalli; Lucidanti e spray per il mantello del cavallo; Pettini, spazzole e guanti per la strigliatura dei cavalli; Kit per la toelettatura del cavallo; Shampoo e balsami per cavalli
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Lovaglás > Lógondozás > Lóápolás: Lónyírógéppenge-élezők; Lónyírógép-pengék; Lónyírógép-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Lovas vágók és trimmerek; Szőrfény- és bevonatspray-k lónak; Lóápolási fésűk, kefék és kesztyűk; Lóápoló készletek; Lósamponok és -kondicionálók